Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3919
Act, how cited.

Sections 29-3919 to 29-3933 shall be known and may be cited as the County Revenue Assistance Act.

Laws 1995, LB 646, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 335, § 2.